Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-487
Cancellation of operator's license or commercial driver's license; when.

(1) If any magistrate or judge finds in his or her judgment of conviction that the application or examiner's certificate pursuant to which the director has issued an operator's license under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act contains any false or fraudulent statement deliberately and knowingly made to any officer as to any matter material to the issuance of such license or does not contain required or correct information or that the person to whom the license was issued was not eligible to receive such license, then the license shall be absolutely void from the date of issue and such motor vehicle operator shall be deemed to be not licensed to operate a motor vehicle. Such license shall be at once canceled of record in his or her office by the director upon receipt of a copy of such judgment of conviction. The director may, upon his or her own motion, summarily cancel any license for any of the reasons set forth in this section if such reason or reasons affirmatively appear on his or her official records.

(2) If the director determines, in a check of an applicant's license status and record prior to issuing a commercial driver's license, or at any time after the commercial driver's license is issued, that the applicant falsified information contained in the application, the director may summarily cancel the person's commercial driver's license or his or her pending application as provided in subsection (1) of this section and disqualify the person from operating a commercial motor vehicle for sixty days.

Laws 1929, c. 148, § 10, p. 517;

C.S.1929, § 60-410;

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 20, p. 517;

Laws 1941, c. 124, § 1, p. 469;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-410;

R.S.1943, § 60-416;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-416;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 38;

Laws 1991, LB 420, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 14;

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 4.